Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1909
Purposes of act; legislative intent.

(1) The purposes of the Child Care Licensing Act are to provide:

(a) Statewide licensure standards for persons providing child care programs; and

(b) The department with authority to coordinate the enforcement of standards on licensees.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the licensing and regulation of programs under the act exist for the protection of children and to assist parents in making informed decisions concerning enrollment and care of their children in such programs.

Laws 1984, LB 130, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 30;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 587;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 175;

Laws 1997, LB 310, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 50;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 68;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 498.